Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1918
Providers exempt.

The department shall
exempt the following providers from the quality assurance assessment:

(1) State-operated
veterans homes listed in section 80-315;

(2) Nursing facilities and skilled nursing
facilities with twenty-six or fewer licensed beds; and

(3) Continuing
care retirement communities.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 18.